Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1772
Collection of taxes; interest on delinquent taxes; distribution.

Interest collected upon delinquent county, city, village, school district, or learning community taxes shall be credited on the books and distributed among the various governmental subdivisions and municipal corporations in the same proportion as the principal of the taxes is credited and distributed.

Laws 1933, c. 132, § 1, p. 509;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 77-1957;

R.S.1943, § 77-1772;

Laws 1947, c. 261, § 1, p. 850;

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 11.